Utah statutes.
63G-6a-902.   Cancellation and rejection of bids and proposals.

(1)  An issuing procurement unit may cancel an invitation for bids, a request for proposals, or other solicitation or reject any or all bids or proposal responses, in whole or in part, as may be specified in the solicitation, when it is in the best interests of the procurement unit in accordance with the rules of the applicable rulemaking authority.

(2)  The reasons for a cancellation or rejection described in Subsection (1) shall be made part of the contract file.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

